Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5765YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2105 Section 1. IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION ââ EXCESS ENERGY 1 PRODUCTION ââ STUDY. The Iowa utilities commission shall 2 conduct a study that examines whether, during any certain 3 time of day, electric power generating facilities are on 4 average producing more energy than the amount necessary to 5 provide electric service to customers. If the commission finds 6 that, during a certain time of day, electric power generating 7 facilities are on average producing more energy than the 8 amount necessary to provide electric service to customers, 9 the commission shall examine the feasibility of providing 10 the excess energy for free to residents of Iowa at that 11 certain time of the day for the purpose of energy storage for 12 individual consumption. The commission shall submit a report 13 detailing its findings and recommendations to the general 14 assembly on or before December 31, 2026. 15